Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.040

Rural library districts—Establishment—Proposed maximum levy rate.

The procedure for the establishment of a rural county library district shall be as follows:

(1) Petitions signed by at least ten percent of the registered voters of the county who voted in the last general election, outside of the area of incorporated cities and towns, asking that the question, "Shall a rural county library district be established?" be submitted to a vote of the people, shall be filed with the county legislative authority. For all districts created after July 26, 2009, the petition may include a proposed initial maximum levy rate. This initial maximum levy rate must not exceed the rate limit set forth in RCW 27.12.050(1).

(2) The county legislative authority, after having determined that the petitions were signed by the requisite number of registered voters, shall place the proposition for the establishment of a rural county library district on the ballot for the vote of the people of the county, outside incorporated cities and towns, at the next succeeding general or special election. If the petition to create the rural county library district included a proposed initial maximum levy rate, the ballot proposition for the establishment of the rural county library district must include the initial maximum levy rate specified in the petition. This ballot must be submitted in such form as to enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote "Yes" and those opposing to vote "No."

(3) If a majority of those voting on the proposition vote in favor of the establishment of the rural county library district, the county legislative authority shall forthwith declare it established.

[ 2009 c 306 s 1; 1990 c 259 s 1; 1955 c 59 s 4. Prior: 1947 c 75 s 11, part; 1943 c 251 s 1, part; 1941 c 65 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8226-4a, part.]

NOTES:

Dissolution—Disposition of property: RCW 27.12.320.

Dissolution of island library district: RCW 27.12.450.